apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="canvys__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysmayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sal</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-shiu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kick/il__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilym</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilmayd</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilee</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilee</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilee</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilee</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilym</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilysmayd</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilys</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilys</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilys</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilys</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilin</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilagh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilagh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilagh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilagh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilagh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ley</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il-shiu</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilit</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="daunse__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eyn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="co-cheaghil"><par n="initial-c"/><i>o-cheagh</i><par n="kick/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="canvys"><par n="initial-c"/><i>anvys</i><par n="canvys__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kickil"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ick</i><par n="kick/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="daunse"><par n="initial-d"/><i>aunse</i><par n="daunse__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="keaysil"><par n="initial-k"/><i>eays</i><par n="kick/il__vblex"/></e>
